Hawaii statutes.
§560:5-313 Temporary substitute guardian. (a)
If the court finds that a guardian is not effectively performing the guardian's
duties and that the welfare of the ward requires immediate action, it may
appoint a temporary substitute guardian for the ward for a specified period not
exceeding six months. Except as otherwise ordered by the court, a temporary
substitute guardian so appointed has the powers set forth in the previous order
of appointment. The authority of any unlimited or limited guardian previously
appointed by the court is suspended as long as a temporary substitute guardian
has authority. If an appointment is made without previous notice to the ward
or the affected guardian and other interested persons, then the temporary
substitute guardian, within five days after the appointment, shall inform them
of the appointment.

(b) The court may remove a temporary
substitute guardian or modify the powers granted at any time. A
temporary substitute guardian shall make any report the court requires. In
other respects, the provisions of this article concerning guardians apply to a
temporary substitute guardian. [L 2004, c 161, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next